Hawaii statutes.
[§329E-2] Immunity. (a)
Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, a health care professional
otherwise authorized to prescribe an opioid antagonist may, directly or by
standing order, prescribe, dispense, and distribute an opioid antagonist to:

(1) An individual at risk of experiencing an
opioid-related drug overdose;

(2) Another person in a position to assist an
individual at risk of experiencing an opioid-related drug overdose; or

(3) A harm reduction organization.

Any such prescribing, dispensing, or
distributing of an opioid antagonist pursuant to this chapter shall be regarded
as being for a legitimate medical purpose in the usual course of professional
practice.

(b) A health care professional or pharmacist
who, acting in good faith and with reasonable care, prescribes, dispenses, or
distributes an opioid antagonist pursuant to this chapter shall not be subject
to any criminal or civil liability or any professional disciplinary action for:

(1) Prescribing, dispensing, or distributing the opioid
antagonist; and

(2) Any outcomes resulting from the eventual
administration of the opioid antagonist.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law to the
contrary, any person may lawfully possess an opioid antagonist.

(d) A person who, acting in good faith and
with reasonable care, administers an opioid antagonist to another person whom
the person believes to be suffering an opioid-related drug overdose shall be
immune from criminal prosecution, sanction under any professional licensing
law, and civil liability for acts or omissions resulting from the
administration. [L 2016, c 68, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next